Utah statutes.
78B-3-301.   Actions involving real property.
(1)  Actions for the following causes involving real property shall be tried
in the county in which the subject of the action, or some part, is situated:
(a)  for the recovery of real property, or of an estate or interest in the
property;
(b)  for the determination, in any form, of the right or interest in the
property;
(c)  for injuries to real property;
(d)  for the partition of real property; and
(e)  for the foreclosure of all liens and mortgages on real property.
(2)  If the real property is situated partly in one county and partly in
another, the plaintiff may select either of the counties, and the county
selected is the proper county for the trial of the action.
